Arkansas, session 2025, SB372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-52-107(a)(3)(A), concerning exceptions
to when vehicular traffic facing a steady red traffic control light or a
traffic control signal exhibiting the word "STOP" shall stop and remain
standing, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(iii)(a) Vehicular traffic facing the signal may
cautiously enter the intersection if:
(1) There is no other vehicular traffic
approaching or in the intersection; and
(2) Before entering the intersection,
the operator of the vehicle comes to a complete stop on the near side of the
intersection before entering a crosswalk, clearly marked stop line, or point
*ZRC070*
03/04/2025 11:57:03 AM ZRC070

SB372
nearest the intersecting roadway where the operator has a view of approaching
traffic on the intersecting roadway.
(b) If other vehicular traffic has entered the
intersection from another roadway or is approaching the intersection, the
operator of the vehicle shall not enter the intersection.
(c) If the operator of a vehicle enters an
intersection under this subdivision (a)(3)(A)(iii), all other vehicular
traffic approaching or entering the intersection after the operator of the
vehicle enters the intersection shall yield to the operator of the vehicle
entering the intersection; and


























03/04/2025 11:57:03 AM ZRC070